Utah statutes.
61-2e-104.   Exemption.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1)  an entity that:

(a)  exclusively employs an individual on an employer-employee basis for the performance of a real estate appraisal activity in the normal course of the entity's business;

(b)  is responsible for ensuring that the real estate appraisal activity being performed by an employee is performed in accordance with applicable appraisal standards; and

(c)  is an appraisal management company that is a subsidiary owned and controlled by a financial institution regulated by a federal financial institution regulatory agency;

(2)  an individual who:

(a)  is an appraiser; and

(b)  in the normal course of business enters into an agreement, whether written or otherwise, with another appraiser for the performance of a real estate appraisal activity that the individual cannot complete for any reason, including:

(i)  competency;

(ii)  work load;

(iii)  schedule; or

(iv)  geographic location; or

(3)  an individual who:

(a)  in the normal course of business enters into an agreement, whether written or otherwise, with an appraiser for the performance of a real estate appraisal activity; and

(b)  under the agreement, cosigns the report of the appraiser performing the real estate appraisal activity upon the completion of the real estate appraisal activity.

